Illinois, session 104th, HB1303.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Kratom 5Consumer Protection Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "Attractive to children" means: 8        (1) manufactured in the shape of humans, cartoons, or 9    animals; or 10        (2) manufactured in a form that bears any reasonable 11    resemblance to an existing candy product that is familiar 12    to the public as a widely distributed, branded food 13    product, such that the product could be mistaken for the 14    branded product, especially by children. 15    "Kratom leaf" means the leaf of the kratom plant, also 16known as Mitragyna speciosa, in fresh, dehydrated, or dried 17form that has been subjected to no post-harvest processing 18other than: 19        (1) drying or size reduction by cutting, milling, or 20    another procedure; and 21        (2) cleaning or sterilization through application of 22    heat, steam, pressurization, irradiation, or other 23    standard treatments applied to food ingredients.   HB1303- 2 -LRB104 05303 BDA 15332 b1    "Kratom leaf extract" means the material extracted from 2kratom leaves through application of a solvent consisting of 3water, ethanol, or food grade carbon dioxide, or any other 4solvent allowed by federal or State rule or regulation to be 5used in the manufacturing of a food ingredient. 6    "Kratom product" means a food or dietary supplement that 7consists of or contains kratom leaf or kratom leaf extract. 8    "Processor" means a person that manufacturers, packages, 9labels, or distributes kratom products or advertises, 10represents, or holds itself out as manufacturing, preparing, 11packaging, or labeling kratom products.12    "Semi-synthesized kratom alkaloids or kratom constituents" 13means a kratom extract that has been further exposed to 14chemicals, processes, or a combination of chemicals and 15processes that would confer a structural change in the 16alkaloids contained within the extract, such as with 17oxidation, reduction, ring opening, or ring closing, resulting 18in material that has been chemically altered. 19    "Synthesized kratom alkaloids or kratom constituents" 20means an alkaloid or alkaloid derivative that has been created 21by chemical synthesis or biosynthetic means, including, but 22not limited to, fermentation, recombinant techniques, yeast 23derived, or enzymatic techniques, rather than traditional food 24preparation techniques, such as heating or extracting.  25    Section 10. Restrictions.   HB1303- 3 -LRB104 05303 BDA 15332 b1    (a) No person shall sell, offer for sale, provide, or 2distribute kratom leaf or a kratom product to a person under 21 3years of age. 4    (b) An online retailer or marketplace of kratom leaf or 5kratom products shall implement an age-verification system to 6ensure compliance with subsection (a). 7    (c) No person shall sell, offer for sale, provide, or 8distribute a kratom product that contains a level of 97-hydroxymitragynine in the alkaloid fraction that is greater 10than 2% of the alkaloid composition of the kratom product. 11    (d) An individual, business, or other entity shall not 12produce, sell, or distribute a kratom product that is 13attractive to children. 14    (e) No person shall sell, offer for sale, provide, or 15distribute a kratom product that is adulterated with a 16dangerous non-kratom substance. A kratom product is 17adulterated with a dangerous non-kratom substance if the 18kratom product contains a poisonous or otherwise deleterious 19non-kratom ingredient, including, but not limited to, the 20substances listed as controlled substances under State or 21federal law. 22    (f) No person shall offer for sale any kratom product that 23contains or is adulterated with synthesized or 24semi-synthesized kratom alkaloids or kratom constituents. 25    Section 15. Manufacturing.   HB1303- 4 -LRB104 05303 BDA 15332 b1    (a) A kratom product sold, offered for sale, or introduced 2into commerce in this State shall be manufactured, packaged, 3labeled, and held in compliance with federal laws and 4regulations for current good manufacturing practices in 5manufacturing, packaging, labeling, or holding operations for 6dietary supplements, as codified at 21 CFR Part 111. 7    (b) A processor that manufactures, processes, packages, or 8holds kratom products out for sale in this State must be 9properly registered with the U.S. Food and Drug 10Administration. 11    Section 20. Tax. 12    (a) A tax is imposed upon the privilege of engaging or 13continuing within this State in the business of the retail 14sale of kratom products. The applicable tax rate is equal to 5% 15of the retail sales price of the kratom or kratom products sold 16during the reporting period. Such tax is imposed in addition 17to all other applicable taxes.18    (b) On or before the 25th day of the first month following 19the end of the calendar quarter, a person in the business of 20the retail sale of kratom products shall file with the 21Department of Revenue a return on a form prescribed by the 22Department of Revenue. Each person in the business of the 23retail sale of kratom products in this State shall pay to the 24Department of Revenue the amount of the tax at the time when 25the person is required to file the person's return for the   HB1303- 5 -LRB104 05303 BDA 15332 b1period during which the tax was collected.2    (c) A person required to file a return under this Section 3who knowingly files a false or incomplete return is guilty of a 4Class A misdemeanor.5    (d) The Department of Revenue has full power to: (i) 6administer and enforce this Law; (ii) collect all taxes, 7penalties, and interest due under this Section; (iii) dispose 8of taxes, penalties, and interest so collected; and (iv) 9determine all rights to credit memoranda or refunds arising on 10account of the erroneous payment of tax, penalty, or interest 11under this Law.12    (e) All of the provisions of Sections 5a, 5b, 5c, 5d, 5e, 135f, 5g, 5i and 5j of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, which 14are not inconsistent with this Act, and Section 3-7 of the 15Uniform Penalty and Interest Act shall apply, as far as 16practicable, to the subject matter of this Act to the same 17extent as if such provisions were included herein.18    (f) The tax imposed in this Section shall be administered 19by the Department of Revenue under rules adopted by the 20Department of Revenue. The Department of Revenue shall adopt 21rules as necessary to implement this Section. 22    Section 25. Penalties. 23    (a) Any person who sells a kratom product in violation of 24this Act shall be subject to a civil penalty up to $5,000 for 25the first violation, and up to $10,000 for the second   HB1303- 6 -LRB104 05303 BDA 15332 b1violation. 2    (b) Any person who sells a kratom product in violation of 3this Act shall be guilty of a business offense for the third 4violation and each subsequent violation, shall be subject to a 5fine of at least $10,000, up to a maximum of $20,000, and shall 6be prohibited from selling kratom products in this State for 3 7years. 8    Section 30. Home rule limitation. The regulation of the 9manufacturing, packaging, labeling, distribution, and sale of 10kratom leaves, kratom leaf extracts, and kratom products is an 11exclusive power and function of the State. A home rule unit may 12not regulate the manufacturing, packaging, labeling, 13distribution, and sale of kratom leaves, kratom leaf extracts, 14and kratom products. This Section is a denial and limitation 15of home rule powers and functions under subsection (h) of 16Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution. 17    (720 ILCS 642/Act rep.)18    Section 90. The Kratom Control Act is repealed.